fst/particles.lexc
! particles — generated from Twanksta data
! Source: ../../data/external/twanksta_entries.json

LEXICON Particles
  stwi+Pcl:stwi  # ;
  pēr+Pcl:pēr  # ;
  mi+Pcl:mi  # ;
  si+Pcl:si  # ;
  si+Pcl:si  # ;
  ti+Pcl:ti  # ;
